Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-5404
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Vacant Property Registration Act:

(1) Evidence of vacancy means any condition or circumstance that on its own or in combination with other conditions or circumstances would lead a reasonable person to believe that a residential building or commercial building is vacant. Such conditions or circumstances may include, but are not limited to:

(a) Overgrown or dead vegetation, including grass, shrubbery, and other plantings;

(b) An accumulation of abandoned personal property, trash, or other waste;

(c) Visible deterioration or lack of maintenance of any building or structure on the property;

(d) Graffiti or other defacement of any building or structure on the property; or

(e) Any other condition or circumstance reasonably indicating that the property is not occupied for residential purposes or being used for the operation of a lawful business;

(2) Municipality means a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village;

(3) Owner means the person or persons shown to be the owner or owners of record on the records of the register of deeds;

(4) Residential building means a house, a condominium, a townhouse, an apartment unit or building, or a trailer house; and

(5) Vacant means that a residential building or commercial building exhibits evidence of vacancy.

Laws 2018, LB256, § 4.